Utah statutes.
26-23b-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Bioterrorism" means:
(a)  the intentional use of any microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or
biological product to cause death, disease, or other biological malfunction in
a human, an animal, a plant, or another living organism in order to influence,
intimidate, or coerce the conduct of government or a civilian population; and
(b)  includes anthrax, botulism, small pox, plague, tularemia, and viral
hemorrhagic fevers.
(2)  "Department" means the Department of Health created in Section 26-1-4 and
a local health department as defined in Section 26A-1-102.
(3)  "Diagnostic information" means a clinical facility's record of
individuals who present for treatment, including the reason for the visit,
chief complaint, presenting diagnosis, final diagnosis, and any pertinent lab
results.
(4)  "Epidemic or pandemic disease":
(a)  means the occurrence in a community or region of cases of an illness
clearly in excess of normal expectancy; and
(b)  includes diseases designated by the Department of Health which have the
potential to cause serious illness or death.
(5)  "Health care provider" shall have the meaning provided for in Section
78B-3-403.
(6)  "Public health emergency" means an occurrence or imminent credible threat
of an illness or health condition, caused by bioterrorism, epidemic or
pandemic disease, or novel and highly fatal infectious agent or biological
toxin, that poses a substantial risk of a significant number of human
fatalities or incidents of permanent or long-term disability.  Such illness or
health condition includes an illness or health condition resulting from a
natural disaster.
(7)  "Reportable emergency illness and health condition" includes the
diseases, conditions, or syndromes designated by the Utah Department of
Health.
